Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-523 Information from filing office;
sale or license of records. (a) If a person that files a written record
requests an acknowledgment of the filing, the filing office shall send to the
person an image of the record showing the number assigned to the record
pursuant to section 490:9-519(a)(1) and the date and time of the filing of the
record. However, if the person furnishes a copy of the record to the filing
office, the filing office may instead:

(1) Note upon the copy the number assigned to the
record pursuant to section 490:9-519(a)(1) and the date and time of the filing
of the record; and

(2) Send the copy to the person.

(b) If a person files a record other than a
written record, the filing office shall communicate to the person an acknowledgment
that provides:

(1) The information in the record;

(2) The number assigned to the record pursuant to
section 490:9-519(a)(1); and

(3) The date and time of the filing of the record.

(c) The filing office shall communicate or
otherwise make available in a record the following information to any person
that requests it:

(1) Whether there is on file on a date and time
specified by the filing office, but not a date earlier than three business days
before the filing office receives the request, any financing statement that:

(A) Designates a particular debtor;

(B) Has not lapsed under section 490:9-515
with respect to all secured parties of record; and

(C) If the request so states, has lapsed under
section 490:9-515 and a record of which is maintained by the filing office
under section 490:9-522(a);

(2) The date and time of filing of each financing
statement; and

(3) The information provided in each financing
statement.

(d) In complying with its duty under
subsection (c), the filing office may communicate information in any medium.
However, if requested, the filing office shall communicate information by
issuing its written certificate.

(e) The filing office shall perform the acts
required by subsections (a) through (d) at the time and in the manner
prescribed by filing-office rule, but not later than two business days after
the filing office receives the request.

(f) At least weekly, the filing office shall
offer to sell or license to the public on a nonexclusive basis, in bulk, copies
of all records filed in it under this part, in every medium from time to time
available to the filing office. [L 2000, c 241, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next